Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.404, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Food truck. new text end new text begin (a) The governing body of a municipality may issue a temporary license to a food truck for the on-sale of intoxicating liquor at a community festival or event, or a private event that the food truck has entered into a contract with a person to cater. For purposes of this section, "food truck" means a business that is licensed or permitted by the licensing authority to prepare and sell food from a motorized vehicle or trailer within the municipality. new text end new text begin (b) A license under this subdivision must specify the conditions under which the intoxicating liquor must be dispensed and consumed and shall not be issued unless the licensee demonstrates that it has liability insurance as prescribed by section 340A.409 to cover the event. The license under this subdivision authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons attending a community festival or event, or, for a private event, to the person who has entered into a catering contract with the food truck, and the person's guests. new text end new text begin (c) A license under this subdivision is subject to the terms, including a license fee, imposed by the issuing municipality and all laws and ordinances governing the sale of intoxicating liquor. A license under this subdivision authorizes the on-sale of intoxicating liquor for not more than ... consecutive days and not more than ... days per year. Licenses under this subdivision are not valid unless first approved by the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (d) The licensee shall notify prior to any community festival or event, or any private catered event: new text end new text begin (1) the police chief of the city where the event will take place, if the event will take place within the corporate limits of a city; or new text end new text begin (2) the county sheriff of the county where the event will take place, if the event will be outside the corporate limits of any city. new text end